test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saaunel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sââuʹŋel contract stem karhunsammal: # Noun - full paradigm
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: sââuʹŋel
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: sâuŋŋal
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: sâuŋŋal
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: sâuŋŋla
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: sâuŋŋlest
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Com+Indef: sâuŋŋlin
     sââuʹŋel+N+Ess+Indef: sâuŋŋlen
     sââuʹŋel+N+Par+Indef: sâuŋŋled
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [sâuŋŋaltaa, sâuŋŋaltää]
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: sâuŋŋal
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: sâuŋŋli
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: sâuŋŋlid
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: sâuŋŋlid
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: sâuŋŋlin
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Com+Indef: sâuŋŋlivuiʹm
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [sâuŋŋlitaa, sâuŋŋlitää]
     
